Utah statutes.
62A-16-202.   Fatality Review Committee for a deceased individual who was
not a resident of the Utah State Hospital or the Utah State Developmental
Center.
(1)  Except for a fatality review committee described in Section 62A-16-203,
the fatality review coordinator shall organize a fatality review committee for
each formal fatality review that is ordered to be conducted under Subsection
62A-16-201(6).
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), a committee described in Subsection
(1):
(a)  shall include the following members:
(i)  the department's fatality review coordinator, who shall designate a
member of the committee to serve as chair of the committee;
(ii)  a member of the board, if there is a board, of the relevant division or
office;
(iii)  the attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(iv) (A)  a member of the management staff of the relevant division or office;
or
(B)  a person who is a supervisor, or a higher level position, from a region
that did not have jurisdiction over the qualified individual; and
(v)  a member of the department's risk management services; and
(b)  may include the following members:
(i)  a health care professional;
(ii)  a law enforcement officer; or
(iii)  a representative of the Office of Public Guardian.
(3)  If a death that is subject to formal review involves a qualified
individual described in Subsection 62A-16-102(2)(c) or (d), the committee may
also include:
(a)  a health care professional;
(b)  a law enforcement officer;
(c)  the director of the Office of Guardian ad Litem;
(d)  an employee of the division who may be able to provide information or
expertise that would be helpful to the formal review; or
(e)  a professional whose knowledge or expertise may significantly contribute
to the formal review.
(4)  A committee described in Subsection (1) may also include a person whose
knowledge or expertise may significantly contribute to the formal review.
(5)  A committee described in this section may not include an individual who
was involved in, or who supervises a person who was involved in, the fatality.
(6)  Each member of a committee described in this section who is not an
employee of the department shall sign a form, created by the department,
indicating that the member agrees to:
(a)  keep all information relating to a fatality review confidential; and
(b)  not release any information relating to a fatality review, unless
required or permitted by law to release the information.
